fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-pahkwîsikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - pahkwîsikan :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Sg: pahkwîsikan
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Pl: pahkwîsikanak
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Obv: pahkwîsikana

      # Poss
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nipahkwîsikan, nipahkwîsikanim]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [opahkwîsikana, opahkwîsikanima]
      

      # Nonposs
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Sg: pahkwîsikan
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Pl: pahkwîsikanak
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Obv: pahkwîsikana
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Distr: pahkwîsikaninâhk
      

      # Der/Dim
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [pahkwîsikanis, pahkwîsikanisîs]
      

      # Poss # Sg
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nipahkwîsikan, nipahkwîsikanim]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kipahkwîsikan, kipahkwîsikanim]
      
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nipahkwîsikaninân, nipahkwîsikaniminân]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kipahkwîsikaninaw, kipahkwîsikaniminaw]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kipahkwîsikaniwâw, kipahkwîsikanimiwâw]
      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nipahkwîsikanak, nipahkwîsikanimak]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kipahkwîsikanak, kipahkwîsikanimak]
      
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nipahkwîsikaninânak, nipahkwîsikaniminânak]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kipahkwîsikaninawak, kipahkwîsikaniminawak]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kipahkwîsikaniwâwak, kipahkwîsikanimiwâwak]
      
      
      

      # Poss # Obv
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: [nipahkwîsikana, nipahkwîsikanima]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: [kipahkwîsikana, kipahkwîsikanima]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [opahkwîsikana, opahkwîsikanima]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: [nipahkwîsikaninâna, nipahkwîsikaniminâna]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: [kipahkwîsikaninawa, kipahkwîsikaniminawa]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: [kipahkwîsikaniwâwa, kipahkwîsikanimiwâwa]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [opahkwîsikaniwâwa, opahkwîsikanimiwâwa]
      pahkwîsikan+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [opahkwîsikanithiwa, opahkwîsikanimithiwa]
      
